Illinois, session 104th, HB4199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consular Identification Document Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 230/10)7    Sec. 10. Acceptance of consular identification document. 8    (a) When requiring members of the public to provide 9identification, each State agency and officer and unit of 10local government shall accept a consular identification 11document as valid identification of a person. 12    (b) A consular identification document shall be accepted 13for purposes of identification only and does not convey an 14independent right to receive benefits of any type.15    (c) A consular identification document may not be accepted 16as identification for obtaining a REAL ID compliant driver's 17license other than a temporary visitor's driver's license , as 18defined by Section 6-100 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or 19registering to vote.20    (d) A consular identification document does not establish 21or indicate lawful U.S. immigration status and may not be 22viewed as valid for that purpose, nor does a consular 23identification document establish a foreign national's right   HB4199- 2 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1to be in the United States or remain in the United States. 2    (e) The requirements of subsection (a) do not apply if:3        (1) a federal law, regulation, or directive or a 4    federal court decision requires a State agency or officer 5    or a unit of local government to obtain different 6    identification;7        (2) a federal law, regulation, or directive preempts 8    state regulation of identification requirements; or9        (3) a State agency or officer or a unit of local 10    government would be unable to comply with a condition 11    imposed by a funding source which would cause the State 12    agency or officer or unit of local government to lose 13    funds from that source. 14    (f) Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to 15prohibit a State agency or officer or a unit of local 16government from:17        (1) requiring additional information from persons in 18    order to verify a current address or other facts that 19    would enable the State agency or officer or unit of local 20    government to fulfill its responsibilities, except that 21    this paragraph (1) does not permit a State agency or 22    officer or a unit of local government to require 23    additional information solely in order to establish 24    identification of the person when the consular 25    identification document is the form of identification 26    presented;  HB4199- 3 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1        (2) requiring fingerprints for identification purposes 2    under circumstances where the State agency or officer or 3    unit of local government also requires fingerprints from 4    persons who have a driver's license or Illinois 5    Identification Card; or6        (3) requiring additional evidence of identification if 7    the State agency or officer or unit of local government 8    reasonably believes that: (A) the consular identification 9    document is forged, fraudulent, or altered; or (B) the 10    holder does not appear to be the same person on the 11    consular identification document.12(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 14Section 1A-16.1 as follows: 15    (10 ILCS 5/1A-16.1)16    Sec. 1A-16.1. Automatic voter registration; Secretary of 17State.18    (a) The Office of the Secretary of State and the State 19Board of Elections, pursuant to an interagency contract and 20jointly adopted rules, shall establish an automatic voter 21registration program that satisfies the requirements of this 22Section and other applicable law. 23    (b) If an application, an application for renewal, a 24change of address form, or a recertification form for a   HB4199- 4 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1driver's license, other than a temporary visitor's driver's 2license, or a State identification card issued by the Office 3of the Secretary of State meets the requirements of the 4federal REAL ID Act of 2005, then that application shall serve 5as a dual-purpose application. The dual-purpose application 6shall: 7        (1) also serve as an application to register to vote 8    in Illinois;9        (2) allow an applicant to change his or her registered 10    residence address or name as it appears on the voter 11    registration rolls;12        (3) provide the applicant with an opportunity to 13    affirmatively decline to register to vote or to change his 14    or her registered residence address or name by providing a 15    check box on the application form without requiring the 16    applicant to state the reason; and17        (4) unless the applicant declines to register to vote 18    or change his or her registered residence address or name, 19    require the applicant to attest, by signature under 20    penalty of perjury as described in subsection (e) of this 21    Section, to meeting the qualifications to register to vote 22    in Illinois at his or her residence address as indicated 23    on his or her driver's license or identification card 24    dual-purpose application. 25    (b-5) If an application, an application for renewal, a 26change of address form, or a recertification form for a   HB4199- 5 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1driver's license, other than a temporary visitor's driver's 2license, or a State identification card issued by the Office 3of the Secretary of State, other than an application or form 4that pertains to a standard driver's license or identification 5card and does not list a social security number for the 6applicant, does not meet the requirements of the federal REAL 7ID Act of 2005, then that application shall serve as a 8dual-purpose application. The dual-purpose application shall:9        (1) also serve as an application to register to vote 10    in Illinois;11        (2) allow an applicant to change his or her registered 12    residence address or name as it appears on the voter 13    registration rolls; and14        (3) if the applicant chooses to register to vote or to 15    change his or her registered residence address or name, 16    then require the applicant to attest, by a separate 17    signature under penalty of perjury, to meeting the 18    qualifications to register to vote in Illinois at his or 19    her residence address as indicated on his or her 20    dual-purpose application.21    (b-10) The Office of the Secretary of State shall clearly 22and conspicuously inform each applicant in writing: (i) of the 23qualifications to register to vote in Illinois, (ii) of the 24penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter 25registration application, (iii) that, unless the applicant 26declines to register to vote or update his or her voter   HB4199- 6 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1registration, his or her dual-purpose application shall also 2serve as both an application to register to vote and his or her 3attestation that he or she meets the eligibility requirements 4for voter registration, and that his or her application to 5register to vote or update his or her registration will be 6transmitted to the State Board of Elections for the purpose of 7registering the person to vote at the residence address to be 8indicated on his or her driver's license or identification 9card, and (iv) that declining to register to vote is 10confidential and will not affect any services the person may 11be seeking from the Office of the Secretary of State. 12    (c) The Office of the Secretary of State shall review 13information provided to the Office of the Secretary of State 14by the State Board of Elections to inform each applicant for a 15driver's license or permit, other than a temporary visitor's 16driver's license, or a State identification card issued by the 17Office of the Secretary of State, other than an application or 18form that pertains to a standard driver's license or 19identification card and does not list a social security number 20for the applicant, whether the applicant is currently 21registered to vote in Illinois and, if registered, at what 22address. 23    (d) The Office of the Secretary of State shall not require 24an applicant for a driver's license or State identification 25card to provide duplicate identification or information in 26order to complete an application to register to vote or change   HB4199- 7 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1his or her registered residence address or name. Before 2transmitting any personal information about an applicant to 3the State Board of Elections, the Office of the Secretary of 4State shall review its records of the identification documents 5the applicant provided in order to complete the application 6for a driver's license or State identification card to confirm 7that nothing in those documents indicates that the applicant 8does not satisfy the qualifications to register to vote in 9Illinois at his or her residence address.10    (e) A completed, signed application for (i) a driver's 11license or permit, other than a temporary visitor's driver's 12license, or a State identification card issued by the Office 13of the Secretary of State, that meets the requirements of the 14federal REAL ID Act of 2005; or (ii) a completed application 15under subsection (b-5) of this Section with a separate 16signature attesting the applicant meets the qualifications to 17register to vote in Illinois at his or her residence address as 18indicated on his or her application shall constitute a signed 19application to register to vote in Illinois at the residence 20address indicated in the application unless the person 21affirmatively declined in the application to register to vote 22or to change his or her registered residence address or name. 23If the identification documents provided to complete the 24dual-purpose application indicate that he or she does not 25satisfy the qualifications to register to vote in Illinois at 26his or her residence address, the application shall be marked   HB4199- 8 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1as incomplete. 2    (f) For each completed and signed application that 3constitutes an application to register to vote in Illinois or 4provides for a change in the applicant's registered residence 5address or name, the Office of the Secretary of State shall 6electronically transmit to the State Board of Elections 7personal information needed to complete the person's 8registration to vote in Illinois at his or her residence 9address. The application to register to vote shall be 10processed in accordance with Section 1A-16.7. 11    (g) If the federal REAL ID Act of 2005 is repealed, 12abrogated, superseded, or otherwise no longer in effect, then 13the State Board of Elections shall establish criteria for 14determining reliable personal information indicating 15citizenship status and shall adopt rules as necessary for the 16Secretary of State to continue processing dual-purpose 17applications under this Section.18    (h) As used in this Section, "dual-purpose application" 19means an application, an application for renewal, a change of 20address form, or a recertification form for driver's license 21or permit, other than a temporary visitor's driver's license, 22or a State identification card offered by the Secretary of 23State, other than an application or form that pertains to a 24standard driver's license or identification card and does not 25list a social security number for the applicant, that also 26serves as an application to register to vote in Illinois.   HB4199- 9 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1"Dual-purpose application" does not mean an application under 2subsection (c) of Section 6-109 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.3(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 4    Section 15. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1A, 2, 4, 4D, 5, and 11 as 6follows: 7    (15 ILCS 335/1A)8    Sec. 1A. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Highly restricted personal information" means an 10individual's photograph, signature, social security number, 11and medical or disability information.12    "Identification card making implement" means any material, 13hardware, or software that is specifically designed for or 14primarily used in the manufacture, assembly, issuance, or 15authentication of an official identification card issued by 16the Secretary of State.17    "Fraudulent identification card" means any identification 18card that purports to be an official identification card for 19which a computerized number and file have not been created by 20the Secretary of State, the United States Government or any 21state or political subdivision thereof, or any governmental or 22quasi-governmental organization. For the purpose of this Act, 23any identification card that resembles an official 24identification card in either size, color, photograph   HB4199- 10 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1location, or design or uses the word "official", "state", 2"Illinois", or the name of any other state or political 3subdivision thereof, or any governmental or quasi-governmental 4organization individually or in any combination thereof to 5describe or modify the term "identification card" or "I.D. 6card" anywhere on the card, or uses a shape in the likeness of 7Illinois or any other state on the photograph side of the card, 8is deemed to be a fraudulent identification card unless the 9words "This is not an official Identification Card", appear 10prominently upon it in black colored lettering in 12-point 11type on the photograph side of the card, and no such card shall 12be smaller in size than 3 inches by 4 inches, and the 13photograph shall be on the left side of the card only.14    "Legal name" means the full given name and surname of an 15individual as recorded at birth, recorded at marriage, or 16deemed as the correct legal name for use in reporting income by 17the Social Security Administration or the name as otherwise 18established through legal action that appears on the 19associated official document presented to the Secretary of 20State.21    "Personally identifying information" means information 22that identifies an individual, including his or her 23identification card number, name, address (but not the 5-digit 24zip code), date of birth, height, weight, hair color, eye 25color, email address, and telephone number.26    "Homeless person" or "homeless individual" has the same   HB4199- 11 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1meaning as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless 2Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 11302, or 42 U.S.C. 11434a(2).3    "Youth for whom the Department of Children and Family 4Services is legally responsible" or "foster child" means a 5child or youth whose guardianship or custody has been accepted 6by the Department of Children and Family Services pursuant to 7the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Children and Family 8Services Act, the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 9and the Adoption Act. This applies to children for whom the 10Department of Children and Family Services has temporary 11protective custody, custody or guardianship via court order, 12or children whose parents have signed an adoptive surrender or 13voluntary placement agreement with the Department.14    "REAL ID compliant identification card" means a standard 15Illinois Identification Card or Illinois Person with a 16Disability Identification Card issued in compliance with the 17REAL ID Act and implementing regulations. REAL ID compliant 18identification cards shall bear a security marking approved by 19the United States Department of Homeland Security.20    "Non-compliant Standard identification card" means a 21standard Illinois Identification Card or Illinois Person with 22a Disability Identification Card issued in a manner which is 23not compliant with the REAL ID Act and implementing 24regulations. Non-compliant Standard identification cards shall 25be marked "Not for Federal Identification" "Federal Limits 26Apply" and shall have a color or design different from the REAL   HB4199- 12 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1ID compliant identification card.2    "Limited Term REAL ID compliant identification card" means 3a REAL ID compliant identification card that is issued to a 4person who is not a permanent resident or citizen of the United 5States or an individual who has an approved application for 6asylum in the United States or has entered the United States in 7refugee status and is marked "Limited Term" on the face of the 8card. 9(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 10    (15 ILCS 335/2)  (from Ch. 124, par. 22)11    Sec. 2. Administration and powers and duties of the 12Administrator. 13    (a) The Secretary of State is the Administrator of this 14Act, and he is charged with the duty of observing, 15administering and enforcing the provisions of this Act.16    (b) The Secretary is vested with the powers and duties for 17the proper administration of this Act as follows:18        1. He shall organize the administration of this Act as 19    he may deem necessary and appoint such subordinate 20    officers, clerks and other employees as may be necessary.21        2. From time to time, he may make, amend or rescind 22    rules and regulations as may be in the public interest to 23    implement the Act.24        3. He may prescribe or provide suitable forms as 25    necessary, including such forms as are necessary to   HB4199- 13 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    establish that an applicant for an Illinois Person with a 2    Disability Identification Card is a "person with a 3    disability" as defined in Section 4A of this Act, and 4    establish that an applicant for a State identification 5    card is a "homeless person" as defined in Section 1A of 6    this Act.7        4. He may prepare under the seal of the Secretary of 8    State certified copies of any records utilized under this 9    Act and any such certified copy shall be admissible in any 10    proceeding in any court in like manner as the original 11    thereof.12        5. Records compiled under this Act shall be maintained 13    for 6 years, but the Secretary may destroy such records 14    with the prior approval of the State Records Commission.15        6. He shall examine and determine the genuineness, 16    regularity and legality of every application filed with 17    him under this Act, and he may in all cases investigate the 18    same, require additional information or proof or 19    documentation from any applicant.20        7. He shall require the payment of all fees prescribed 21    in this Act, and all such fees received by him shall be 22    placed in the Road Fund of the State treasury except as 23    otherwise provided in Section 12 of this Act. Whenever any 24    application to the Secretary for an identification card 25    under this Act is accompanied by any fee, as required by 26    law, and the application is denied after a review of   HB4199- 14 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    eligibility, which may include facial recognition 2    comparison, the applicant shall not be entitled to a 3    refund of any fees paid.4        8. Beginning July 1, 2017, he shall refuse to issue a 5    REAL ID compliant identification card under this Act to 6    any person who has been issued a REAL ID compliant 7    driver's license under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Any such 8    person may, at his or her discretion, surrender the REAL 9    ID compliant driver's license in order to become eligible 10    to obtain a REAL ID compliant identification card. 11        9. The Secretary may issue both REAL ID compliant 12    identification cards and non-compliant standard 13    identification cards, and may permit applicants to 14    designate which type of identification card they wish to 15    receive. All provisions of this Act applicable to 16    non-compliant standard identification cards shall also 17    apply to REAL ID compliant identification cards, except 18    where the provisions are inconsistent with the REAL ID Act 19    and implementing regulations. The Secretary shall 20    establish by rule the date on which issuance of REAL ID 21    compliant identification cards will begin. 22(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    (15 ILCS 335/4)  (from Ch. 124, par. 24)24    Sec. 4. Identification card. 25    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section,   HB4199- 15 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 2Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 3Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 4of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 5renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 6person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 7license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 8Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 9card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 10supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 11photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 12the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 13Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 14applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 15photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 16Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 17purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 18was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 19photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 20applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 21"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 22person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 23State.24    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 25current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 26Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to   HB4199- 16 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1utilize the same residence address and name on the 2identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 3records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 4promulgate rules to implement this provision. 5    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 6in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act or a peace officer, 7the applicant may elect to have his or her office or work 8address listed on the card instead of the applicant's 9residence or mailing address. The Secretary may promulgate 10rules to implement this provision. For the purposes of this 11subsection (a-10), "peace officer" means any person who by 12virtue of his or her office or public employment is vested by 13law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for 14a violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 15duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific 16violations. 17    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 18process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 19The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 20issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 21rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 22for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 23deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 24The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 25process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 26Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of   HB4199- 17 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1expedited identification card requests received on a given day 2exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 3in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 4expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 5service shall be refunded to the applicant. 6    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 7Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 8Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 9a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 10county jail or county department of corrections as follows: if 11the person has a social security number,12        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 13    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 14    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 15    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 16    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 17    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 18    committed person has a social security number. If the 19    committed person does not have a social security number 20    and is eligible for a social security number, the 21    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 22    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 23    social security number. If the committed person's 24    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 25    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 26    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social   HB4199- 18 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    security number with the Social Security Administration, 2    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 3    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 4    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 5    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 6    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 7    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 8    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 9    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 10    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 11    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 12    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 13    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 14    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 15    (2).16        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 17    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 18    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 19    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 20    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 21    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 22    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 23    number, if the committed has a social security number. If 24    the committed person does not have a social security 25    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 26    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois   HB4199- 19 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 2    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 3    the applicant's social security number with the Social 4    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 5    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 6    Identification Card.7    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 8described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 9Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 10facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 11transfer the form.12    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 13Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 14person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 15aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 16Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 17a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 18county jail or county department of corrections, if the 19released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 20Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 21release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 22Identification Card verification form completed by the 23correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 24birth, social security number, if the person has a social 25security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 26The verification form must have been completed no more than 30   HB4199- 20 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 2Identification Card.3    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 4limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 5person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 6his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 7card, if the person has a social security number, or other 8documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 9Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 10Identification Card may not be renewed. 11    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 12was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 13because his or her photograph or demographic information 14matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 15driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 16released person who does not have a social security number and 17is eligible for a social security number.18    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 19Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 20release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 21Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 22certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 23security card, if the person has a social security number, or 24other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 25proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 26of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card   HB4199- 21 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 2discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 3bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 4required documents. Documents proving residence address may 5include any official document of the Department of Human 6Services showing the person's address after release and a 7Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 8executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.9    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 10Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 11upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 12custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 13unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 14certificate and social security card, if the person has a 15social security number, or other documents authorized by the 16Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 17verification form completed by the Department of Human 18Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 19security number, if the person has a social security number, 20and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 21The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 22days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 23Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 24limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 25sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 26absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human   HB4199- 22 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 2with the required documents. Documents proving residence 3address shall include any official document of the Department 4of Human Services showing the person's address after release 5and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 6may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 7Services. 8    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 9Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 10Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 11person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 12person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 13who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 14Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 15to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 16card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 17the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 18card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 19no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 20supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 21photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 22designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 23with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 24comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 25the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 26Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for   HB4199- 23 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 2Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 3a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 4the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 5requests, the card shall include a description of the 6applicant's disability and any information about the 7applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 8determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 9emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 10signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 11presence of 2 two witnesses who attest to the authenticity of 12the mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 13Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 14situation by the person to whom it was issued.15    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 16may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 17a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 18disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 19disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 20other documentation of disability whenever any State law 21requires that a person with a disability provide such 22documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 23Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 24cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 25benefit which is not available to all persons with like 26disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an   HB4199- 24 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 2evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 3Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 4used by any person other than the person named on such card to 5prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 6disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 7the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 8named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 9so used.10    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 11under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 12for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 13Disability Identification Card. 14    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 15Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 16the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 17taken based upon that medical information.18    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 19original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 20Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 21person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 22those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 23Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 24of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 25Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 26Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be   HB4199- 25 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1at the discretion of the Secretary of State.2    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 3Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 4issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 5upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 6which the person becomes 21 years of age.7    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 8military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 9ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 10which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 11education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 12in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 13services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 14issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 15Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 16appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 17predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 18not issue any other identification card which identifies an 19occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 20characteristics of the identification card holder which is 21unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.22    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 23of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 24identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 25the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 26shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under   HB4199- 26 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 2separated under honorable conditions. 3    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 4discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 5State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 6applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 7State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 8issued in every county and applications shall be made 9available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 10citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 11upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 12shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 13signature or mark.14    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 15designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 16Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 17card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 18Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 19specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 20card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 21Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.22    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 23identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible 24to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 25of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 26issued an identification card to the person. The data elements   HB4199- 27 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 2individual's current Department record.3    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 4with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 5or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 6verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 7Secretary or another state.8    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 9shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.10    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 11card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 12physical possession of the device on which the mobile 13identification card is accessed during verification.14    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 15require:16        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 17    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 18    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;19        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 20    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 21    privacy protection laws and regulations; and22        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 23    credential data elements that are necessary to complete 24    the transaction for which data is being requested.25    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 26implementing the following requirements:  HB4199- 28 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 2    credential data elements for which the relying party 3    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential 4    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 5    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 6    elements;7        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 8    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 9    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 10    and shall not track or compile information without the 11    credential holder's consent; and12        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 13    information regarding the use of the credential as 14    required by State or federal law.15    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required 16to have the holder's their physical credential on the holder's 17their person for all purposes for which an identification card 18is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 19agency shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 20credential instead of a physical credential.21    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 22that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 23holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential 24holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 25of an electronic credential.26    (3) When required by law and upon request by law   HB4199- 29 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 2holder's physical credential.3    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 4surrender the individual's their physical credential to law 5enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 6electronic credential has been provisioned.7    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 8physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a 9representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 10a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 11consequences for failure to produce such an identification 12card.13    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 14necessary to implement a mobile identification card.15    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not 16serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 17officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 18other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 19presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 20officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 21card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 22mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 23opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 24willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 25court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 26be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the   HB4199- 30 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1mobile device.2    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 3identification card as defined in this subsection shall not 4exceed $6.5    (n) As used in this Section:6    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 7Administrators.8    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 9or identification card.10    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 11driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.12    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 13information that is found on the Department's customer record.14    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 15Driver Services.16    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 17the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 18identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 19Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.20    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 21that includes a method for provisioning electronic 22credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 23data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.24    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 25identification card.26    "ISO" means the International Organization for   HB4199- 31 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 2procedures. 3    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 4provided on an Identification Card.5    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 6available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 7Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 8to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that 9contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 10an identification card, and that displays the current status 11of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 12not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 13Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 14application on a mobile device.15    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued Department 16issued document that conveys identity in accordance with the 17Illinois Identification Card Act.18    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 19credential onto a device.20    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 21holder presents the electronic credential.22    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 23the electronic credential through the use of secured 24encryption communication. 25    (o) (f) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 26request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect   HB4199- 32 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 2space on each original or renewal of an identification card 3for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 4person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 5(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 6(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 7103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 88-6-24; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 911-26-24.) 10    (15 ILCS 335/4D)11    Sec. 4D. Issuance of confidential identification cards.12    (a) Requirements for use of confidential identification 13cards. Confidential identification cards may be issued to 14local, state, and federal government agencies for bona fide 15law enforcement purposes. The identification cards may be 16issued in fictitious names and addresses, and may be used only 17in confidential, investigative, or undercover law enforcement 18operations. Confidential identification cards may be issued as 19REAL ID compliant or non-compliant standard identification 20cards. 21    (b) Application procedures for confidential identification 22cards:23        (1) Applications by local, state, and federal 24    government agencies for confidential identification cards 25    must be made to the Secretary of State Police Department   HB4199- 33 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    on a form and in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of 2    State Police Department.3        (2) The application form must include information, as 4    specific as possible without compromising investigations 5    or techniques, setting forth the need for the 6    identification cards and the uses to which the 7    identification cards will be limited.8        (3) The application form must be signed and verified 9    by the local, state, or federal government agency head or 10    designee.11        (4) Information maintained by the Secretary of State 12    Police Department for confidential identification cards 13    must show the fictitious names and addresses on all 14    records subject to public disclosure. All other 15    information concerning these confidential identification 16    cards are exempt from disclosure unless the disclosure is 17    ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.18    (c) Cancellation procedures for confidential 19identification cards:20        (1) The Secretary of State Police Department may 21    cancel or refuse to renew confidential identification 22    cards when they have reasonable cause to believe the cards 23    are being used for purposes other than those set forth in 24    the application form or authorized by this Section.25        (2) A government agency must request cancellation of 26    confidential identification cards that are no longer   HB4199- 34 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    required for the purposes for which they were issued.2        (3) Upon the request of the Secretary of State Police 3    Department, all cancelled confidential identification 4    cards must be promptly returned to the Secretary of State 5    Police Department by the government agency to which they 6    were issued. 7(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (15 ILCS 335/5)9    Sec. 5. Applications. 10    (a) Any natural person who is a resident of the State of 11Illinois may file an application for an identification card, 12or for the renewal thereof, in a manner prescribed by the 13Secretary. Each original application shall be completed by the 14applicant in full and shall set forth the legal name, 15residence address and zip code, social security number, if the 16person has a social security number, birth date, sex and a 17brief description of the applicant. The applicant shall be 18photographed, unless the Secretary of State has provided by 19rule for the issuance of identification cards without 20photographs and the applicant is deemed eligible for an 21identification card without a photograph under the terms and 22conditions imposed by the Secretary of State, and he or she 23shall also submit any other information as the Secretary may 24deem necessary or such documentation as the Secretary may 25require to determine the identity of the applicant. In   HB4199- 35 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow the 2applicant to provide a mailing address. If the applicant is an 3employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 4with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 5"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 6Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 7Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 8a judicial officer as defined in Section 1-10 of the Judicial 9Privacy Act or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to have 10his or her office or work address in lieu of the applicant's 11residence or mailing address. An applicant for an Illinois 12Person with a Disability Identification Card must also submit 13with each original or renewal application, on forms prescribed 14by the Secretary, such documentation as the Secretary may 15require, establishing that the applicant is a "person with a 16disability" as defined in Section 4A of this Act, and setting 17forth the applicant's type and class of disability as set 18forth in Section 4A of this Act. For the purposes of this 19subsection (a), "peace officer" means any person who by virtue 20of his or her office or public employment is vested by law with 21a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for a 22violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 23duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific 24violations. 25    (a-5) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 26for a digital driver's license and identification card   HB4199- 36 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 22020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 3implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 4that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 5applicants to choose between "male", "female", or "non-binary" 6when designating the applicant's sex on the identification 7card application form. The sex designated by the applicant 8shall be displayed on the identification card issued to the 9applicant. 10    (b) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 11or renewal identification card application under this Act, the 12Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 13veteran for purposes of issuing an identification card with a 14veteran designation under subsection (c-5) of Section 4 of 15this Act. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but are 16not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, Department 17of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not receive a 18form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic training, 19Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an identification 20card issued under the federal Veterans Identification Card Act 21of 2015, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs 22summary of benefits letter. If the document cannot be stamped, 23the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a 24certificate to the veteran to provide to the Secretary of 25State. The Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall 26advise the Secretary as to what other forms of proof of a   HB4199- 37 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1person's status as a veteran are acceptable.2    For each applicant who is issued an identification card 3with a veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 4Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 5address, date of birth, gender, and such other demographic 6information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 7The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 8applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 9writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 10Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 11veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 12shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 13as a veteran, or the identification card will be canceled 14cancelled. 15    For purposes of this subsection (b):16    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 17States, including a member of any reserve component or 18National Guard unit. 19    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 20forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 21conditions. 22    (b-1) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 23plates under Section 3-664 of the Illinois Vehicle Code may 24apply for an identification card with space for a designation 25as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any fee for this 26application. If the Secretary does not waive the fee, any fee   HB4199- 38 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1charged to the applicant must be deposited into the Illinois 2Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is authorized to issue 3rules to implement this subsection. 4    (c) All applicants for REAL ID compliant standard Illinois 5Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a Disability 6Identification Cards shall provide proof of lawful status in 7the United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 8Applicants who are unable to provide the Secretary with proof 9of lawful status are ineligible for REAL ID compliant 10identification cards under this Act.11    (d) (Blank). The Secretary of State may accept, as proof 12of date of birth and written signature for any applicant for a 13standard identification card who does not have a social 14security number or documentation issued by the United States 15Department of Homeland Security authorizing the applicant's 16presence in this country, any passport validly issued to the 17applicant from the applicant's country of citizenship or a 18consular identification document validly issued to the 19applicant by a consulate of that country as defined in Section 205 of the Consular Identification Document Act. Any such 21documents must be either unexpired or presented by an 22applicant within 2 years of its expiration date. 23(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 24103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 12-1-24.) 25    (15 ILCS 335/11)  (from Ch. 124, par. 31)  HB4199- 39 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    Sec. 11. Records. 2    (a) The Secretary may make a search of his records and 3furnish information as to whether a person has a current 4Standard Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois Person 5with a Disability Identification Card then on file, upon 6receipt of a written application therefor accompanied with the 7prescribed fee. However, the Secretary may not disclose 8medical information concerning an individual to any person, 9public agency, private agency, corporation or governmental 10body unless the individual has submitted a written request for 11the information or unless the individual has given prior 12written consent for the release of the information to a 13specific person or entity. This exception shall not apply to: 14(1) offices and employees of the Secretary who have a need to 15know the medical information in performance of their official 16duties, or (2) orders of a court of competent jurisdiction. 17When medical information is disclosed by the Secretary in 18accordance with the provisions of this Section, no liability 19shall rest with the Office of the Secretary of State as the 20information is released for informational purposes only.21    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 22Secretary may release personally identifying information only 23to:24        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 25    need to know that information for issuance of driver's 26    licenses, permits, or identification cards and   HB4199- 40 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    investigation of fraud or misconduct;2        (2) other governmental agencies for use in their 3    official governmental functions;4        (3) law enforcement agencies for a criminal or civil 5    investigation, except as restricted by subsections (g) and 6    (h);7        (3-5) the State Board of Elections as may be required 8    by an agreement the State Board of Elections has entered 9    into with a multi-state voter registration list 10    maintenance system; or11        (4) any entity that the Secretary has authorized, by 12    rule.13    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 14Secretary may release highly restricted personal information 15only to:16        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 17    need to access the information for the issuance of 18    driver's licenses, permits, or identification cards and 19    investigation of fraud or misconduct;20        (2) law enforcement officials for a criminal or civil 21    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 22    subsections (g) and (h);23        (3) the State Board of Elections for the purpose of 24    providing the signature for completion of voter 25    registration; or26        (4) any other entity the Secretary has authorized by   HB4199- 41 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    rule.2    (d) Documents required to be submitted with an application 3for an identification card to prove the applicant's identity 4(name and date of birth), social security number or lack of a 5social security number, written signature, residency, and, as 6applicable, proof of lawful citizenship and immigration status 7and country of citizenship shall be confidential and shall not 8be disclosed except to the following persons:9        (1) the individual to whom the identification card was 10    issued, upon written request;11        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 12    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 13    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 14    permits, or identification cards and investigation of 15    fraud or misconduct;16        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 17    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 18    subsections (g) and (h);19        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 20    rule.21    (e) The Secretary may not disclose an individual's social 22security number or any associated information obtained from 23the Social Security Administration without the written request 24or consent of the individual except: (i) to officers and 25employees of the Secretary who have a need to know the social 26security number in the performance of their official duties;   HB4199- 42 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1(ii) except as restricted by subsections (g) and (h) to law 2enforcement officials for a civil or criminal law enforcement 3investigation if an officer of the law enforcement agency has 4made a written request to the Secretary specifying the law 5enforcement investigation for which the social security number 6is being sought; (iii) under a lawful court order signed by a 7judge; (iv) to the Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs for 8the purpose of confirming veteran status to agencies in other 9states responsible for the issuance of state identification 10cards for participation in State-to-State verification 11service; or (v) the last 4 digits to the Illinois State Board 12of Elections for purposes of voter registration and as may be 13required pursuant to an agreement for a multi-state voter 14registration list maintenance system. The Secretary retains 15the right to require additional verification regarding the 16validity of a request from law enforcement. If social security 17information is disclosed by the Secretary in accordance with 18this Section, no liability shall rest with the Office of the 19Secretary of State or any of its officers or employees, as the 20information is released for official purposes only. 21    (f) The Secretary of State shall not provide facial 22recognition search services or photographs obtained in the 23process of issuing an identification card to any federal, 24State, or local law enforcement agency or other governmental 25entity for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws. 26This subsection shall not apply to requests from federal,   HB4199- 43 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1State, or local law enforcement agencies or other governmental 2entities for facial recognition search services or photographs 3obtained in the process of issuing a driver's license or 4permit when the purpose of the request relates to criminal 5activity other than violations of immigration laws. 6    (g) (Blank). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 7the Secretary may not release highly restricted personal 8information or personally identifying information or disclose 9documents described in subsection (d) to any immigration 10agent, as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 11unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 12that production of such information or documents is 13specifically required:14        (1) a lawful court order;15        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 16    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 17    States; or18        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 19    federal or State court.20    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 21subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 22information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 23receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 24Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 25whom such information was requested that a court order, 26warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the   HB4199- 44 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.2    (h) (Blank). The Secretary shall not enter into or 3maintain any agreement regarding the sharing of any highly 4restricted personal information or personally identifying 5information or documents described in subsection (d) unless 6all other parties to such agreement certify that the 7information obtained will not be used for civil immigration 8purposes or knowingly disseminated to any third party for any 9purpose related to civil immigration enforcement. 10(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    Section 20. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 12changing Sections 6-100, 6-100.5, 6-105.1, 6-106, 6-110.1, 136-110.2, 6-121, and 6-122 as follows: 14    (625 ILCS 5/6-100)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-100)15    Sec. 6-100. Definitions. For the purposes of this Chapter, 16the following words shall have the meanings ascribed to them:17    (a) Application Process. The process of obtaining a 18driver's license, identification card, or permit. The process 19begins when a person enters a Secretary of State Driver 20Services facility and requests a driver's license, 21identification card or permit.22    (b) Conviction. A final adjudication of guilty by a court 23of competent jurisdiction either after a bench trial, trial by 24jury, plea of guilty, order of forfeiture, or default.  HB4199- 45 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    (c) Identification Card. A document made or issued by or 2under the authority of the United States Government, the State 3of Illinois or any other state or political subdivision 4thereof, or any governmental or quasi-governmental 5organization that, when completed with information concerning 6the individual, is of a type intended or commonly accepted for 7the purpose of identifying the individual.8    (d) Non-compliant Standard driver's license. A driver's 9license issued in a manner which is not compliant with the REAL 10ID Act and implementing regulations. Non-compliant Standard 11driver's licenses shall be marked "Not for Federal 12Identification" "Federal Limits Apply" and shall have a color 13or design different from the REAL ID compliant driver's 14license.15    (e) REAL ID compliant driver's license. A driver's license 16issued in compliance with the REAL ID Act and implementing 17regulations. REAL ID compliant driver's licenses shall bear a 18security marking approved by the United States Department of 19Homeland Security.20    (f) Limited Term REAL ID compliant driver's license. A 21REAL ID compliant driver's license issued to a person who is 22not a permanent resident or citizen of the United States, or an 23individual who has an approved application for asylum in the 24United States or has entered the United States in refugee 25status, and marked "Limited Term" on the face of the license. 26(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB4199- 46 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    (625 ILCS 5/6-100.5)2    Sec. 6-100.5. Issuance of REAL ID compliant and 3non-compliant standard driver's licenses. The Secretary of 4State may issue both REAL ID compliant driver's licenses and 5non-compliant standard driver's licenses, and may permit 6applicants to designate which type of driver's license they 7wish to receive. All provisions of this Code applicable to 8non-compliant standard driver's licenses shall also apply to 9REAL ID compliant driver's licenses, except where the 10provisions are inconsistent with the REAL ID Act and 11implementing regulations. The Secretary shall establish by 12rule the date on which issuance of REAL ID compliant driver's 13licenses will begin.14(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-105.1)16    Sec. 6-105.1. Temporary visitor's driver's license.17    (a) The Secretary of State may issue a temporary visitor's 18driver's license to a foreign national who (i) resides in this 19State, (ii) is ineligible to obtain a social security number, 20and (iii) presents to the Secretary documentation, issued by 21United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, 22authorizing the person's presence in this country.23    (a-5) The Secretary of State may issue a temporary 24visitor's driver's license to an applicant who (i) has resided   HB4199- 47 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1in this State for a period in excess of one year, (ii) is 2ineligible to obtain a social security number, and (iii) is 3unable to present documentation issued by the United States 4Citizenship and Immigration Services authorizing the person's 5presence in this country. The applicant shall submit a valid 6unexpired passport from the applicant's country of citizenship 7or a valid unexpired consular identification document issued 8by a consulate of that country as defined in Section 5 of the 9Consular Identification Document Act (5 ILCS 230/5). 10    (a-10) Applicants for a temporary visitor's driver's 11license who are under 18 years of age at the time of 12application shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 136-107 and 6-108 of this Code. 14    (b) A temporary visitor's driver's license issued under 15subsection (a) is valid for 3 years, or for the period of time 16the individual is authorized to remain in this country, 17whichever ends sooner. A temporary visitor's driver's license 18issued under subsection (a-5) shall be valid for a period of 3 19years.20    (b-5) A temporary visitor's driver's license issued under 21this Section may not be accepted for proof of the holder's 22identity. A temporary visitor's driver's license issued under 23this Section shall contain a notice on its face, in 24capitalized letters, stating that the temporary visitor's 25driver's license may not be accepted for proof of identity. 26    (c) The Secretary shall adopt rules for implementing this   HB4199- 48 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Section, including rules:2        (1) regarding the design and content of the temporary 3    visitor's driver's license;4        (2) establishing criteria for proof of identification 5    and residency of an individual applying under subsection 6    (a-5);7        (3) designating acceptable evidence that an applicant 8    is not eligible for a social security number; and9        (4) regarding the issuance of temporary visitor's 10    instruction permits.11    (d) Any person to whom the Secretary of State may issue a 12temporary visitor's driver's license shall be subject to any 13and all provisions of this Code and any and all implementing 14regulations issued by the Secretary of State to the same 15extent as any person issued a driver's license, unless 16otherwise provided in this Code or by administrative rule, 17including but not limited to the examination requirements in 18Section 6-109 as well as the mandatory insurance requirements 19and penalties set forth in Article VI of Chapter 7 of this 20Code. 21    (d-5) A temporary visitor's driver's license is invalid if 22the holder is unable to provide proof of liability insurance 23as required by Section 7-601 of this Code upon the request of a 24law enforcement officer, in which case the holder commits a 25violation of Section 6-101 of this Code. 26    (e) Temporary visitor's driver's licenses shall be issued   HB4199- 49 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1from a central location after the Secretary of State has 2verified the information provided by the applicant. 3    (f) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 4to be known as the DMV Transformation Fund. All fees collected 5for the issuance of temporary visitor's driver's licenses 6shall be deposited into the Fund. These funds shall, subject 7to appropriation, be used by the Office of the Secretary of 8State for operational costs, including, but not limited to, 9personnel, facilities, computer programming, and data 10transmission. 11    (g) (Blank). No temporary visitor's driver's licenses 12shall be issued after the effective date of this amendatory 13Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 14(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 104-2, eff. 7-1-25.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-106)16    Sec. 6-106. Application for license or instruction permit. 17    (a) Every application for any permit or license authorized 18to be issued under this Code shall be made upon a form 19furnished by the Secretary of State. Every application shall 20be accompanied by the proper fee and payment of such fee shall 21entitle the applicant to not more than 3 attempts to pass the 22examination within a period of one year after the date of 23application. 24    (b) Every application shall state the legal name, social 25security number, zip code, date of birth, sex, and residence   HB4199- 50 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1address of the applicant; briefly describe the applicant; 2state whether the applicant has theretofore been licensed as a 3driver, and, if so, when and by what state or country, and 4whether any such license has ever been cancelled, suspended, 5revoked or refused, and, if so, the date and reason for such 6cancellation, suspension, revocation or refusal; shall include 7an affirmation by the applicant that all information set forth 8is true and correct; and shall bear the applicant's signature. 9In addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow 10the applicant to provide a mailing address. In the case of an 11applicant who is a judicial officer or peace officer, the 12Secretary may allow the applicant to provide an office or work 13address in lieu of a residence or mailing address. The 14application form may also require the statement of such 15additional relevant information as the Secretary of State 16shall deem necessary to determine the applicant's competency 17and eligibility. The Secretary of State may, in his 18discretion, by rule or regulation, provide that an application 19for a drivers license or permit may include a suitable 20photograph of the applicant in the form prescribed by the 21Secretary, and he may further provide that each drivers 22license shall include a photograph of the driver. The 23Secretary of State may utilize a photograph process or system 24most suitable to deter alteration or improper reproduction of 25a drivers license and to prevent substitution of another photo 26thereon. For the purposes of this subsection (b), "peace   HB4199- 51 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1officer" means any person who by virtue of his or her office or 2public employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain 3public order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal 4statute of this State, whether that duty extends to all 5violations or is limited to specific violations. 6    (b-1) (Blank). Every application shall state the social 7security number of the applicant; except if the applicant is 8applying for a standard driver's license and, on the date of 9application, is ineligible for a social security number, then:10        (1) if the applicant has documentation, issued by the 11    United States Department of Homeland Security, authorizing 12    the applicant's presence in this country, the applicant 13    shall provide such documentation instead of a social 14    security number; and15        (2) if the applicant does not have documentation 16    described in paragraph (1), the applicant shall provide, 17    instead of a social security number, the following:18            (A) documentation establishing that the applicant 19        has resided in this State for a period in excess of one 20        year;21            (B) a passport validly issued to the applicant 22        from the applicant's country of citizenship or a 23        consular identification document validly issued to the 24        applicant by a consulate of that country as defined in 25        Section 5 of the Consular Identification Document Act, 26        as long as such documents are either unexpired or   HB4199- 52 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1        presented by an applicant within 2 years of its 2        expiration date; and 3            (C) a social security card, if the applicant has a 4        social security number. 5    (b-3) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 6for a digital driver's license and identification card 7issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 82020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 9implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 10that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 11applicants to choose between "male", "female" or "non-binary" 12when designating the applicant's sex on the driver's license 13application form. The sex designated by the applicant shall be 14displayed on the driver's license issued to the applicant. 15    (b-5) Every applicant for a REAL ID compliant driver's 16license or permit shall provide proof of lawful status in the 17United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. Applicants 18who are unable to provide the Secretary with proof of lawful 19status may apply for a driver's license or permit under 20Section 6-105.1 of this Code. 21    (c) The application form shall include a notice to the 22applicant of the registration obligations of sex offenders 23under the Sex Offender Registration Act. The notice shall be 24provided in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of 25State. For purposes of this subsection (c), "sex offender" has 26the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2 of the Sex Offender   HB4199- 53 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1Registration Act. 2    (d) Any male United States citizen or immigrant who 3applies for any permit or license authorized to be issued 4under this Code or for a renewal of any permit or license, and 5who is at least 18 years of age but less than 26 years of age, 6must be registered in compliance with the requirements of the 7federal Military Selective Service Act. The Secretary of State 8must forward in an electronic format the necessary personal 9information regarding the applicants identified in this 10subsection (d) to the Selective Service System. The 11applicant's signature on the application serves as an 12indication that the applicant either has already registered 13with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing 14the Secretary to forward to the Selective Service System the 15necessary information for registration. The Secretary must 16notify the applicant at the time of application that his 17signature constitutes consent to registration with the 18Selective Service System, if he is not already registered. 19    (e) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 20or renewal driver's license application under this Code, the 21Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 22veteran for purposes of issuing a driver's license with a 23veteran designation under subsection (e-5) of Section 6-110 of 24this Code. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but 25are not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, 26Department of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not   HB4199- 54 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1receive a form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic 2training, Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an 3identification card issued under the federal Veterans 4Identification Card Act of 2015, or a United States Department 5of Veterans Affairs summary of benefits letter. If the 6document cannot be stamped, the Illinois Department of 7Veterans Affairs shall provide a certificate to the veteran to 8provide to the Secretary of State. The Illinois Department of 9Veterans Affairs shall advise the Secretary as to what other 10forms of proof of a person's status as a veteran are 11acceptable.12    For each applicant who is issued a driver's license with a 13veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 14Department of Veterans Affairs with the applicant's name, 15address, date of birth, gender and such other demographic 16information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 17The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 18applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 19writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 20Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 21veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 22shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 23as a veteran, or the driver's license will be cancelled. 24    For purposes of this subsection (e):25    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 26States, including a member of any reserve component or   HB4199- 55 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1National Guard unit. 2    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 3forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 4conditions. 5    (f) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 6plates under Section 3-664 of this Code may apply for an 7original or renewal driver's license with space for a 8designation as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any 9fee for this application. If the Secretary does not waive the 10fee, any fee charged to the applicant must be deposited into 11the Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is 12authorized to issue rules to implement this subsection. 13(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 14104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.1)16    Sec. 6-110.1. Confidentiality of captured photographs or 17images. 18    (a) The Secretary of State shall maintain a file on or 19contract to file all photographs and signatures obtained in 20the process of issuing a driver's license, permit, or 21identification card. Except as otherwise provided in this 22Section, the photographs and signatures shall be confidential 23and shall not be disclosed except to the following persons:24        (1) the individual to whom the driver's license or 25    permit was issued, upon written request;  HB4199- 56 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 2    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 3    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 4    permits, or identification cards and investigation of 5    fraud or misconduct;6        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 7    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 8    Section 6-110.3;9        (3-5) the State Board of Elections for the sole 10    purpose of providing the signatures required by a local 11    election authority to register a voter through an online 12    voter registration system; 13        (3-10) officers and employees of the Secretary of 14    State who have a need to have access to the stored images 15    for purposes of issuing and controlling notary public 16    commissions and for the purpose of providing the 17    signatures required to process online applications for 18    appointment and commission as notaries public; or 19        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 20    rule.21    (b) The Secretary of State shall not provide facial 22recognition search services or photographs obtained in the 23process of issuing a driver's license or permit to any 24federal, State, or local law enforcement agency or other 25governmental entity for the purpose of enforcing federal 26immigration laws. This subsection shall not apply to requests   HB4199- 57 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1from federal, State, or local law enforcement agencies or 2other governmental entities for facial recognition search 3services or photographs obtained in the process of issuing a 4driver's license or permit when the purpose of the request 5relates to criminal activity other than violations of 6immigration laws. 7(Source: P.A. 102-354, eff. 8-13-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.2)9    Sec. 6-110.2. Confidentiality of documents submitted with 10an application for a driver's license. Documents required to 11be submitted with an application for a driver's license to 12prove the applicant's identity (name and date of birth), 13social security number or lack of a social security number, 14written signature, residency, and, as applicable, proof of 15lawful citizenship or immigration status and country of 16citizenship shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed 17except to the following persons:18        (1) the individual to whom the driver's license or 19    permit was issued, upon written request;20        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 21    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 22    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 23    permits, or identification cards and investigation of 24    fraud or misconduct;25        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal   HB4199- 58 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 2    Section 6-110.3;3        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 4    rule.5(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-121)7    Sec. 6-121. Issuance of confidential drivers' licenses.8    (a) Requirements for use of confidential drivers' 9licenses. Confidential drivers' licenses may be issued to 10local, state, and federal government agencies for bona fide 11law enforcement purposes. The drivers' licenses may be issued 12with fictitious names and addresses, and may be used only for 13confidential, investigative, or undercover law enforcement 14operations. Confidential drivers' licenses may be issued as 15REAL ID compliant or non-compliant standard driver's licenses. 16    (b) Application procedures for confidential drivers' 17licenses:18        (1) Applications by local, state, and federal 19    government agencies for confidential drivers' licenses 20    must be made to the Secretary of State Police Department 21    on a form and in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of 22    State Police Department.23        (2) The application form must include information, as 24    specific as possible without compromising investigations 25    or techniques, setting forth the need for the drivers'   HB4199- 59 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    licenses and the uses to which the licenses will be 2    limited.3        (3) The application form must be signed and verified 4    by the local, state, or federal government agency head or 5    designee.6        (4) Registration information maintained by the 7    Secretary of State Police Department for confidential 8    drivers' licenses must show the fictitious names and 9    addresses on all records subject to public disclosure. All 10    other information concerning these confidential drivers' 11    licenses are exempt from disclosure unless the disclosure 12    is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.13    (c) Revocation and cancellation procedures for 14confidential drivers' licenses:15        (1) The Secretary of State Police Department may 16    revoke or refuse to renew confidential drivers' licenses 17    when they have reasonable cause to believe the licenses 18    are being used for purposes other than those set forth in 19    the application form or authorized by this Section. 20    Confidential drivers' licenses may also be revoked where 21    traffic violation citations have been issued to the driver 22    and subsequent investigation reveals that the issuance of 23    the citations was unrelated to the purposes for which the 24    confidential driver's license was issued. In such cases, 25    the citations and any resulting court orders, convictions, 26    supervisions or other sanctions must be treated by the   HB4199- 60 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    Secretary of State as though they were issued in relation 2    to the true driver's license of the individual to whom the 3    confidential driver's license was issued.4        (2) A government agency must request cancellation of 5    confidential drivers' licenses that are no longer required 6    for the purposes for which they were issued.7        (3) All revoked confidential drivers' licenses must be 8    promptly returned to the Secretary of State Police 9    Department by the government agency to which they were 10    issued. 11(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/6-122)13    Sec. 6-122. Expedited driver's license. The Secretary of 14State may provide for an expedited process for the issuance of 15a driver's license, excluding temporary visitor's driver's 16licenses. The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the 17issuance of an expedited driver's license, to be set by rule, 18not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary for 19expedited driver's license service shall be deposited into the 20Secretary of State Special Services Fund. The Secretary may 21adopt rules regarding the eligibility, process, and fee for an 22expedited driver's license.23(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.3 rep.)  HB4199- 61 -LRB104 16010 LNS 29262 b1    Section 25. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 2repealing Section 6-110.3. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.